Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1534.01
Leave of absence; effect.

A person who has been hired to fulfill the duties of a teacher or school nurse who is on a leave of absence shall not accrue rights under sections 85-1528 to 85-1534 during the period that the person is fulfilling such duties.

Laws 2005, LB 352, § 1.